Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-409
Rule 409. Payment of medical and similar expenses.

Evidence of furnishing or offering or promising to pay medical, hospital, or similar expenses occasioned by an injury is not admissible to prove liability for the injury.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 19.